District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3202

Imposition and rate of tax.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 102, 24 DCR 5765
Aug. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-137, § 3, 29 DCR 2757
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 10(a), 36 DCR 4160
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 3(i), 45 DCR 4826

History

1981 Ed., § 47-3202.
1973 Ed., § 47-3102.

Prior Codifications

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 4-137 provided that the provisions of the act shall take effect on the first day of the first month which begins more than 30 days after August 14, 1982, or on October 1, 1982, whichever is later.

Effective Dates